New York, session 2025-2026, S3676.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (k) of subdivision 2 of section 265-a of the real 2 property law, as added by chapter 308 of the laws of 2006, is amended to 3 read as follows: 4 (k) "Residence" and "residential real property" means residential real 5 property consisting of one- to four-family dwelling units[, one of which 6 the equity seller occupies or occupied at a time immediately prior to 7 the equity sale as his or her primary residence]. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05218-01-5